North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47C. North Carolina Condominium Act.
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Condominiums.
§ 47C-2-118.
Termination of condominium.

Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain (G.S. 47C-1-107), a condominium may be terminated only by agreement of unit owners of units to which at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association are allocated, or any
larger percentage the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units in the condominium are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses.

An agreement to terminate must be evidenced by the execution of a termination agreement, or ratifications thereof, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The termination agreement must specify a date after which the agreement
will be void unless recorded before that date. A termination agreement and all ratifications thereof must be recorded in every county in which a portion of the condominium is situated, and is effective only upon recordation.

In the case of a condominium containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide that all the common elements and units of the condominium shall be sold following termination. If, pursuant
to the agreement, any real estate in the condominium is to be sold following termination, the termination agreement must set forth the minimum terms of the sale.

In the case of a condominium containing any units not having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide for sale of the common elements, but may not require that the units be sold following termination, unless
the declaration as originally recorded provided otherwise or unless all the unit owners consent to the sale.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract for the sale of real estate in the condominium, but the contract is not binding on the unit owners until approved pursuant to subsections (a) and (b). If any real estate in the condominium is
to be sold following termination, title to that real estate, upon termination, vests in the association as trustee for the holders of all interests in the units. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate
to effect the sale. Until the sale has been concluded and the proceeds thereof distributed, the association continues in existence with all powers it had before termination. Proceeds of the sale must be distributed to unit owners
and lienholders as their interests may appear, in proportion to the respective interests of unit owners as provided in subsection (h). Unless otherwise specified in the termination agreement, as long as the association holds title
to the real estate, each unit owner and his successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his unit. During the period of that occupancy, each unit owner
and his successors in interest remain liable for all assessments and other obligations imposed on unit owners by this Chapter or the declaration.

If the real estate constituting the condominium is not to be sold following termination, title to the common elements and, in a condominium containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, title to all the real estate in
the condominium, vests in the unit owners upon termination as tenants in common in proportion to their respective interests as provided in subsection (h), and liens on the units shift accordingly. While the tenancy in common exists,
each unit owner and his successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his unit.

Following termination of the condominium, the proceeds of any sale of real estate, together with the assets of the association, are held by the association as trustee for unit owners and holders of liens on the units as their interests may appear. Following
termination, creditors of the association holding liens on the units, which were recorded before termination, may enforce those liens in the same manner as any lienholder. All other creditors of the association are to be treated
as if they had perfected liens on the units immediately before termination.

The respective interests of unit owners referred to in subsections (e), (f) and (g) are as follows:

Except as provided in paragraph (2), the respective interests of unit owners are the fair market value of their units, limited common elements, and common element interests immediately before the termination, as determined by one or more independent appraisers
selected by the association. The decision of the independent appraisers shall be distributed to the unit owners and becomes final unless disapproved within 30 days after distribution by unit owners of units to which twenty-five
percent (25%) of the votes in the association are allocated. The proportion of any unit owner’s interest to that of all unit owners is determined by dividing the fair market value of that unit owner’s unit and common element
interest by the total fair market values of all the units and common elements.

If any unit or any limited common element is destroyed to the extent that an appraisal of the fair market value thereof prior to destruction cannot be made, the interests of all unit owners are their respective common element interests immediately before
the termination.

Except as provided in subsection (j), foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against the entire condominium does not of itself terminate the condominium, and foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the condominium,
other than withdrawable real estate, does not withdraw that portion from the condominium. Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against withdrawable real estate does not of itself withdraw that real estate from the
condominium, but the person taking title thereto has the right to require from the association, upon request, an amendment excluding the real estate from the condominium.

If a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the real estate comprising the condominium has priority over the declaration, and the lien or encumbrance has not been released, the parties foreclosing the lien or encumbrance may upon foreclosure, record
an instrument excluding the real estate subject to that lien or encumbrance from the condominium.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-119.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 47C-2-120.
Master associations.

If the declaration for a condominium provides that any of the powers described in

G.S. 47C-3-102

are to be exercised by or may be delegated to a profit or nonprofit corporation (or unincorporated association) which exercises those or other powers on behalf of one or more condominiums or for the benefit of the
unit owners of one or more condominiums, all provisions of this chapter applicable to unit owners’ associations apply to any such corporation (or unincorporated association), except as modified by this section.

Unless a master association is acting in the capacity of an association described in

G.S. 47C-3-101

, it may exercise the powers set forth in G.S. 47C-3-102(a)(2) only to the extent expressly permitted in the declarations of condominiums which are part of the master association or expressly described in the delegations
of power from those condominiums to the master association.

If the declaration of any condominium provides that the executive board may delegate certain powers to a master association, the members of the executive board have no liability for the acts or omissions of the master association with respect to those
powers following delegation.

The rights and responsibilities of unit owners with respect to the unit owners’ association set forth in

G.S. 47C-3-103

, 47C-3-108, 47C-3-109, and 47C-3-110 apply in the conduct of the affairs of a master association only to those persons who elect the board of a master association, whether or not those persons are otherwise unit
owners within the meaning of this Chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 47C-3-103(f) with respect to the election of the executive board of an association by all unit owners after the period of declarant control ends and even if a master association is also an association described in

G.S. 47C-3-101

, the certificate of incorporation or other instrument creating the master association and the declaration of each condominium, the powers of which are assigned by the declaration or delegated to the master association,
may provide that the executive board of the master association must be elected after the period of declarant control in any of the following ways:

All unit owners of all condominiums subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board.

All members of the executive boards of all condominiums subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board.

All unit owners of each condominium subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

All members of the executive board of each condominium subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-121.
Merger or consolidation of condominiums.

Any two or more condominiums may, by agreement of the unit owners as provided in subsection (b), be merged or consolidated into a single condominium. In the event of a merger or consolidation, unless the agreement otherwise provides, the resultant condominium
shall be, for all purposes, the legal successor of all of the pre-existing condominiums, and the operations and activities of all associations of the pre-existing condominiums shall be merged or consolidated into a single association
which shall hold all powers, rights, obligations, assets and liabilities of all pre-existing associations.

An agreement of two or more condominiums to merge or consolidate pursuant to subsection (a) must be evidenced by an agreement prepared, executed, recorded and certified by the president of the association of each of the pre-existing condominiums following
approval by owners of units to which are allocated the percentage of votes in each condominium required to terminate that condominium. Any such agreement must be executed in the same manner as a deed and recorded in every county
in which a portion of the condominium is located and is not effective until recorded.

Every merger or consolidation agreement must provide for the reallocation of the allocated interests in the new association among the units of the resultant condominium either (i) by stating such reallocations or the formulas upon which they are based
or (ii) by stating the percentage of overall allocated interests of the new condominium which are allocated to all of the units comprising each of the pre-existing condominiums and providing that the portion of such percentages
allocated to each unit formerly comprising a part of such pre-existing condominium shall be equal to the percentages of allocated interests allocated to such unit by the declaration of the pre-existing condominiums.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.